North Dakota, session 69, HB1276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 53-06.1-03 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Except as authorized by the attorney general, an organization that has its license
suspended or revoked, or has relinquished or not renewed its license and not
disbursed its net proceeds, is ineligible for a license or permit. Only one of two or more
closely related organizations may have a license or permit at one time. A college or
university fraternity, sorority, or club is not closely related to an educational
organization. An organization shall apply for a permit as follows:
a. An organization recognized as a public-spirited organization by the governing
body of a city or county may apply for permits. A local permit may allow the
organization to conduct only raffles, bingo, or sports pools. A restricted event
permit may allow the organization to conduct only raffles, bingo, sports pools,
paddlewheels, twenty-one, and poker. The organization or closely related
organizations as a whole may only award a primary prize that does not exceed
eight thousand dollars and total prizes of all games domay not exceed forty
thousand dollars per year. These maximum prize amounts do not apply to raffles
conducted under chapter 20.1-08. The determination of what is a "public-spirited
organization" is within the sole discretion of the governing body, except an
organization that is a nonfederal candidate campaign committee, nonfederal
political action committee, state political party, or legislative district party
Page No. 1 25.0810.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
committee must be recognized as a "public - spirited organization" . An
organization shall disclose on the application its intended use of the net income
from the gaming activity. A governing body may issue a permit for games to be
held at designated times and places.
b. An organization shall apply to the governing body of the city or county in which
the proposed site is located. Application must be made on a form prescribed by
the attorney general. Approval may be granted at the discretion of the governing
body. A governing body may establish a fee not to exceed twenty-five dollars for
each permit. A permit must be on a fiscal year basis from July first to June
thirtieth or on a calendar-year basis.
c. An organization that has a local permit or a restricted event permit may use the
net income from the gaming activity for any purpose that does not violate this
chapter or gaming rules, unless. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the
organization is a nonfederal candidate campaign committee, nonfederal political
action committee, state political party, or legislative district party committee, the
organization may use the net income from a raffle for a political purpose. For
purposes of this subdivision, a public-spirited use includes a political purpose.
d. An organization that has a restricted event permit is restricted to one event per
year and:
(1) May not pay remuneration to employees for personal services;
(2) Shall use chips as wagers;
(3) Shall redeem a player's chips for merchandise prizes or cash;
(4) Shall disburse net income to eligible uses referenced in subdivision c, if
applicable, and in section 53-06.1-11.1; and
(5) Shall file a report prescribed by the attorney general with the governing
body and attorney general.
Page No. 2 25.0810.01000